New York, session 2025-2026, S6064.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 168-a of the executive law, as 2 amended by chapter 542 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 3. The following days shall be days of commemoration in each year: 5 January sixth, to be known as "Haym Salomon Day", January twenty-sev- 6 enth, to be known as "Holocaust Remembrance Day", February fourth, to be 7 known as "Rosa Parks Day", February fifteenth, to be known as "Susan B. 8 Anthony Day", February sixteenth, to be known as "Lithuanian Independ- 9 ence Day", February twenty-eighth, to be known as "Gulf War Veterans' 10 Day", March fourth, to be known as "Pulaski Day", March eighth, to be 11 known as "International Women's Day", March tenth, to be known as 12 "Harriet Tubman Day", March twenty-third, to be known as "Pakistan day", 13 March twenty-ninth, to be known as "Vietnam Veterans' Day", April ninth, 14 to be known as "POW Recognition Day", April twenty-seventh, to be known 15 as "Coretta Scott King Day", April twenty-eighth, to be known as "Work- 16 ers' Memorial Day", the first Tuesday in May to be known as "New York 17 State Teacher Day", May seventeenth, to be known as "Thurgood Marshall 18 Day", the first Sunday in June, to be known as "Children's Day", June 19 second, to be known as "Italian Independence Day", June twelfth, to be 20 known as "Women Veterans Recognition Day", June nineteenth, to be known 21 as "Juneteenth Freedom Day", June twenty-fifth, to be known as "Korean 22 War Veterans' Day", the second Monday in July, to be known as "Abolition 23 Commemoration Day", August twenty-fourth, to be known as "Ukrainian 24 Independence Day", August twenty-sixth, to be known as "Women's Equality 25 Day", September eleventh, to be known as "Battle of Plattsburgh Day" and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10661-01-5 S. 6064 2 1 also to be known as "September 11th Remembrance Day", September thir- 2 teenth, to be known as "John Barry Day" and also to be known as "Uncle 3 Sam Day in the State of New York", September seventeenth, to be known as 4 "Friedrich Wilhelm von Steuben Memorial Day", the third Friday in 5 September to be known as "New York State POW/MIA Recognition Day" except 6 if such date of commemoration cannot be observed due to a religious 7 holiday, such observances shall then be conducted on the second Friday 8 of September, the last Saturday in September, to be known as "War of 9 1812 Day", the fourth Saturday of September, known as "Native-American 10 Day", the last Sunday in September, to be known as "Gold Star Mothers' 11 Day", October fifth, to be known as "Raoul Wallenberg Day", October 12 eleventh, to be known as "New Netherland Day in the State of New York", 13 October eighteenth, to be known as "Disabilities History Day", October 14 twenty-seventh, to be known as "Theodore Roosevelt Day", November ninth, 15 to be known as "Witness for Tolerance Day", November twelfth, to be 16 known as "Elizabeth Cady Stanton Day", the third Tuesday in November to 17 be known as "New York State School-Related Professionals Recognition 18 Day", November twenty-sixth, to be known as "Sojourner Truth Day", 19 November thirtieth, to be known as "Shirley Chisholm Day", December 20 third, to be known as "International Day of Persons with Disabilities", 21 December seventh, to be known as "Pearl Harbor Day", December sixteenth, 22 to be known as "Bastogne Day" and that day of the Asian lunar calendar 23 designated as new year to be known as "Asian New Year". 24 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.